Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-441
Court of Military Review; members; qualifications; appointment.

The Adjutant General, upon the recommendation of the State Judge Advocate, shall appoint a Court of Military Review consisting of three members each to serve for a term of five years. The members shall be either civilians or commissioned officers of the military forces who are admitted to the bar of the Supreme Court of Nebraska, except that any commissioned officer of the military forces who because of his position as a judge advocate could have a conflict in a review of any proceedings may not be appointed.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 41, p. 1571.